Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1026.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 304. (1) If a domestic credit union changes the location of its principal place of business in this state, the domestic credit union must shall provide the director with written notice at least not less than 7 days before the change of location. (2) A domestic credit union shall file the address of the principal place of business and the names and titles of the officials and senior management employees of the domestic credit union with the director on a form prescribed by the director. If the name or title of an official or senior management employee of a domestic credit union changes, the credit union shall provide the director with written notice of the change within not more than 7 days after the change. (3) A domestic credit union may establish and maintain branches. The credit union shall provide written notice to the director of the location of a branch before establishing the branch. (4) A domestic credit union and 1 or more domestic or foreign credit unions or other financial organizations may establish and maintain service centers. One or more of the financial organizations that establish a service center may operate the service center, or the financial organizations organizing the service center may contract with another person to operate the service center. A domestic credit union may refer to a service center as a branch. (5) Subject to all of the following, a domestic credit union may adopt or change 1 or more assumed names: (a) The domestic credit union shall give written notice of a proposed assumed name to the director at least not less than 30 days before using the assumed name. (b) The director may deny a domestic credit union the right to use an assumed name or terminate a credit union's right to use an assumed name if the director determines that the assumed name is confusing or misleading or for any other reason. (c) A domestic credit union using an assumed name shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the name of the credit union and the assumed name in all signs, advertising, mailings, and similar materials and shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the assumed name and the name of the credit union in all legal documents, certificates of deposit, signature cards, loan agreements, account statements, checks, drafts, and other similar documents. (d) An assumed name may contain the phrase "credit union".